Illinois, session 104th, HB3697.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community Emergency Services and Support 5Act is amended by changing Sections 5, 15, 25, 30, 40, 55, and 665 as follows: 7    (50 ILCS 754/5)8    Sec. 5. Findings. The General Assembly recognizes that the 9Illinois Department of Human Services Division of Mental 10Health is preparing to provide mobile mental and behavioral 11health services to all Illinoisans as part of the federally 12mandated adoption of the 9-8-8 phone number. The General 13Assembly also recognizes that many cities and some states have 14successfully established mobile emergency mental and 15behavioral health services as part of their emergency response 16system to support people who need such support and do not 17present a threat of physical violence to the mobile mental 18health relief providers. In light of that experience, the 19General Assembly finds that in order to promote and protect 20the health, safety, and welfare of the public, it is necessary 21and in the public interest to provide emergency response, with 22or without medical transportation, to individuals requiring 23mental health or behavioral health services in a manner that   HB3697- 2 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1is substantially equivalent to the response already provided 2to individuals who require emergency physical health care. 3    The General Assembly also recognizes the history of 4vulnerable populations being subject to unwarranted 5involuntary commitment or other human rights violations 6instead of receiving necessary care during acute crises which 7may contribute to an understandable apprehension of behavioral 8health services among individuals who have historically been 9subject to these practices. The General Assembly intends for 10the Mobile Mental Health Relief Providers regulated by this 11Act to assist with crises that do not rise to the level of 12involuntary commitment. However, the General Assembly also 13recognizes that Mobile Mental Health Relief Providers may, 14during the course of assisting with a crisis, encounter 15individuals who present an imminent threat of injury to 16themselves or others unless they receive assistance through 17the involuntary commitment process. This Act intends to 18balance concerns about misuse of the involuntary commitment 19process with the need for emergency care for individuals whose 20crisis presents an imminent threat of injury. 21(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 22    (50 ILCS 754/15)23    Sec. 15. Definitions. As used in this Act:24    "Chemical restraint" means any drug used for discipline or 25convenience and not required to treat medical symptoms.  HB3697- 3 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    "Community services" and "community-based mental or 2behavioral health services" include both public and private 3settings. 4    "Division of Mental Health" means the Division of Mental 5Health of the Department of Human Services.6    "Emergency" means an emergent circumstance caused by a 7health condition, regardless of whether it is perceived as 8physical, mental, or behavioral in nature, for which an 9individual may require prompt care, support, or assessment at 10the individual's location. 11    "Mental or behavioral health" means any health condition 12involving changes in thinking, emotion, or behavior, and that 13the medical community treats as distinct from physical health 14care.15    "Mobile mental health relief provider" means a person 16engaging with a member of the public to provide the mobile 17mental and behavioral service established in conjunction with 18the Division of Mental Health establishing the 9-8-8 emergency 19number. "Mobile mental health relief provider" does not 20include a Paramedic (EMT-P) or EMT, as those terms are defined 21in the Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems Act, unless 22that responding agency has agreed to provide a specialized 23response in accordance with the Division of Mental Health's 24services offered through its 9-8-8 number and has met all the 25requirements to offer that service through that system. 26    "Physical health" means a health condition that the   HB3697- 4 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1medical community treats as distinct from mental or behavioral 2health care.3    "Physical restraint" means any manual method or physical 4or mechanical device, material, or equipment attached or 5adjacent to an individual's body that the individual cannot 6easily remove and restricts freedom of movement or normal 7access to one's body. "Physical restraint" does not include a 8seat belt if it is used during transportation of an individual 9and the individual has access to the mechanism that releases 10the seat belt.11    "Public safety answering point" or "PSAP" means the 12primary answering location of an emergency call that meets the 13appropriate standards of service and is responsible for 14receiving and processing those calls and events according to a 15specified operational policy a Public Safety Answering Point 16tele-communicator.17    "Community services" and "community-based mental or 18behavioral health services" may include both public and 19private settings.20    "Treatment relationship" means an active association with 21a mental or behavioral care provider able to respond in an 22appropriate amount of time to requests for care.23(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 24    (50 ILCS 754/25)25    Sec. 25. State goals.   HB3697- 5 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    (a) 9-1-1 PSAPs, emergency services dispatched through 29-1-1 PSAPs, and the mobile mental and behavioral health 3service established by the Division of Mental Health must 4coordinate their services so that the State goals listed in 5this Section are achieved. Appropriate mobile response service 6for mental and behavioral health emergencies shall be 7available regardless of whether the initial contact was with 89-8-8, 9-1-1 or directly with an emergency service dispatched 9through 9-1-1. Appropriate mobile response services must:10        (1) whenever possible, ensure that individuals 11    experiencing mental or behavioral health crises are 12    diverted from hospitalization or incarceration and are 13    instead linked with available appropriate community 14    services; 15        (2) include the option of on-site care if that type of 16    care is appropriate and does not override the care 17    decisions of the individual receiving care. Providing care 18    in the community, through methods like mobile crisis 19    units, is encouraged. If effective care is provided on 20    site, and if it is consistent with the care decisions of 21    the individual receiving the care, further transportation 22    to other medical providers is not required by this Act;23        (3) recommend appropriate referrals for available 24    community services if the individual receiving on-site 25    care is not already in a treatment relationship with a 26    service provider or is unsatisfied with their current   HB3697- 6 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    service providers. The referrals shall take into 2    consideration waiting lists and copayments, which may 3    present barriers to access; and 4        (4) subject to the care decisions of the individual 5    receiving care, coordinate provide transportation for any 6    individual experiencing a mental or behavioral health 7    emergency to the least restrictive setting feasible. 8    Transportation shall be to the most integrated and least 9    restrictive setting appropriate in the community, such as 10    to the individual's home or chosen location, community 11    crisis respite centers, clinic settings, behavioral health 12    centers, or the offices of particular medical care 13    providers with existing treatment relationships to the 14    individual seeking care.15    (b) Prioritize requests for emergency assistance. 9-1-1 16PSAPs, emergency services dispatched through 9-1-1 PSAPs, and 17the mobile mental and behavioral health service established by 18the Division of Mental Health must provide guidance for 19prioritizing calls for assistance and maximum response time in 20relation to the type of emergency reported.21    (c) Provide appropriate response times. From the time of 22first notification, 9-1-1 PSAPs, emergency services dispatched 23through 9-1-1 PSAPs, and the mobile mental and behavioral 24health service established by the Division of Mental Health 25must provide the response within response time appropriate to 26the care requirements of the individual with an emergency.  HB3697- 7 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    (d) Require appropriate mobile mental health relief 2provider training. Mobile mental health relief providers must 3have adequate training to address the needs of individuals 4experiencing a mental or behavioral health emergency. Adequate 5training at least includes:6        (1) training in de-escalation techniques;7        (2) knowledge of local community services and 8    supports; and 9        (3) training in respectful interaction with people 10    experiencing mental or behavioral health crises, including 11    the concepts of stigma and respectful language; .12        (4) training in recognizing and working with people 13    with neurodivergent and developmental disability diagnoses 14    and in the techniques available to help stabilize and 15    connect them to further services; and16        (5) training in the involuntary commitment process, in 17    identification of situations that meet the standards for 18    involuntary commitment, and in cultural competencies and 19    social biases to guard against any group being 20    disproportionately subjected to the involuntary commitment 21    process or the use of the process not warranted under the 22    legal standard for involuntary commitment. 23    (e) Require minimum team staffing. The Division of Mental 24Health, in consultation with the Regional Advisory Committees 25created in Section 40, shall determine the appropriate 26credentials for the mental health providers responding to   HB3697- 8 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1calls, including to what extent the mobile mental health 2relief providers must have certain credentials and licensing, 3and to what extent the mobile mental health relief providers 4can be peer support professionals.5    (f) Require training from individuals with lived 6experience. Training shall be provided by individuals with 7lived experience to the extent available.8    (g) Adopt guidelines directing referral to restrictive 9care settings. Mobile mental health relief providers must have 10guidelines to follow when considering whether to refer an 11individual to more restrictive forms of care, like emergency 12room or hospital settings.13    (h) Specify regional best practices. Mobile mental health 14relief providers providing these services must do so 15consistently with best practices, which include respecting the 16care choices of the individuals receiving assistance. Regional 17best practices may be broken down into sub-regions, as 18appropriate to reflect local resources and conditions. With 19the agreement of the impacted EMS Regions, providers of 20emergency response to physical emergencies may participate in 21another EMS Region for mental and behavioral response, if that 22participation shall provide a better service to individuals 23experiencing a mental or behavioral health emergency. 24    (i) Adopt system for directing care in advance of an 25emergency. The Division of Mental Health shall select and 26publicly identify a system that allows individuals who   HB3697- 9 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1voluntarily chose to do so to provide confidential advanced 2care directions to individuals providing services under this 3Act. No system for providing advanced care direction may be 4implemented unless the Division of Mental Health approves it 5as confidential, available to individuals at all economic 6levels, and non-stigmatizing. The Division of Mental Health 7may defer this requirement for providing a system for advanced 8care direction if it determines that no existing systems can 9currently meet these requirements. 10    (j) Train dispatching staff. The personnel staffing 9-1-1, 113-1-1, or other emergency response intake systems must be 12provided with adequate training to assess whether coordinating 13with 9-8-8 is appropriate.14    (k) Establish protocol for emergency responder 15coordination. The Division of Mental Health shall establish a 16protocol for mobile mental health relief providers, law 17enforcement, and fire and ambulance services to request 18assistance from each other, and train these groups on the 19protocol.20    (l) Integrate law enforcement. The Division of Mental 21Health shall provide for law enforcement to request mobile 22mental health relief provider assistance whenever law 23enforcement engages an individual appropriate for services 24under this Act. If law enforcement would typically request EMS 25assistance when it encounters an individual with a physical 26health emergency, law enforcement shall similarly dispatch   HB3697- 10 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1mental or behavioral health personnel or medical 2transportation when it encounters an individual in a mental or 3behavioral health emergency.4(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 5    (50 ILCS 754/30)6    Sec. 30. State prohibitions. 9-1-1 PSAPs, emergency 7services dispatched through 9-1-1 PSAPs, and the mobile mental 8and behavioral health service established by the Division of 9Mental Health must coordinate their services so that, based on 10the information provided to them, the following State 11prohibitions are avoided: 12    (a) Law enforcement responsibility for providing mental 13and behavioral health care. In any area where mobile mental 14health relief providers are available for dispatch, law 15enforcement shall not be dispatched to respond to an 16individual requiring mental or behavioral health care unless 17that individual is (i) involved in a suspected violation of 18the criminal laws of this State, or (ii) presents a threat of 19physical injury to self or others. Mobile mental health relief 20providers are not considered available for dispatch under this 21Section if 9-8-8 reports that it cannot dispatch appropriate 22service within the maximum response times established by each 23Regional Advisory Committee under Section 45.24        (1) Standing on its own or in combination with each 25    other, the fact that an individual is experiencing a   HB3697- 11 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    mental or behavioral health emergency, or has a mental 2    health, behavioral health, or other diagnosis, is not 3    sufficient to justify an assessment that the individual is 4    a threat of physical injury to self or others, or requires 5    a law enforcement response to a request for emergency 6    response or medical transportation.7        (2) If, based on its assessment of the threat to 8    public safety, law enforcement would not accompany medical 9    transportation responding to a physical health emergency, 10    unless requested by mobile mental health relief providers, 11    law enforcement may not accompany emergency response or 12    medical transportation personnel responding to a mental or 13    behavioral health emergency that presents an equivalent 14    level of threat to self or public safety. 15        (3) Without regard to an assessment of threat to self 16    or threat to public safety, law enforcement may station 17    personnel so that they can rapidly respond to requests for 18    assistance from mobile mental health relief providers if 19    law enforcement does not interfere with the provision of 20    emergency response or transportation services. To the 21    extent practical, not interfering with services includes 22    remaining sufficiently distant from or out of sight of the 23    individual receiving care so that law enforcement presence 24    is unlikely to escalate the emergency.25    (b) Mobile mental health relief provider involvement in 26involuntary commitment. Mobile mental health relief providers   HB3697- 12 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1may participate in the involuntary commitment process only to 2the extent permitted under the Mental Health and Developmental 3Disabilities Code. The Division of Behavioral Health shall, in 4consultation with each Regional Advisory Committee, as 5appropriate, monitor the use of involuntary commitment under 6this Act and provide systemic recommendations to improve 7outcomes for those subject to commitment. In order to maintain 8the appropriate care relationship, mobile mental health relief 9providers shall not in any way assist in the involuntary 10commitment of an individual beyond (i) reporting to their 11dispatching entity or to law enforcement that they believe the 12situation requires assistance the mobile mental health relief 13providers are not permitted to provide under this Section; 14(ii) providing witness statements; and (iii) fulfilling 15reporting requirements the mobile mental health relief 16providers may have under their professional ethical 17obligations or laws of this State. This prohibition shall not 18interfere with any mobile mental health relief provider's 19ability to provide physical or mental health care.20    (c) Use of law enforcement for transportation. In any area 21where mobile mental health relief providers are available for 22dispatch, unless requested by mobile mental health relief 23providers, law enforcement shall not be used to provide 24transportation to access mental or behavioral health care, or 25travel between mental or behavioral health care providers, 26except where (i) no alternative is available; (ii) the   HB3697- 13 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1individual requests transportation from law enforcement and 2law enforcement mutually agrees to provide transportation; or 3(iii) the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code 4requires law enforcement to provide transportation.5    (d) Reduction of educational institution obligations. The 6services coordinated under this Act may not be used to replace 7any service an educational institution is required to provide 8to a student. It shall not substitute for appropriate special 9education and related services that schools are required to 10provide by any law.11    (e) This Section is operative beginning on the date the 3 12conditions in Section 65 are met or July 1, 2025, whichever is 13earlier.14(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 15103-645, eff. 7-1-24.) 16    (50 ILCS 754/40)17    Sec. 40. Statewide Advisory Committee. 18    (a) The Division of Mental Health shall establish a 19Statewide Advisory Committee to review and make 20recommendations for aspects of coordinating 9-1-1 and the 219-8-8 mobile mental health response system most appropriately 22addressed on a State level.23    (b) Issues to be addressed by the Statewide Advisory 24Committee include, but are not limited to, addressing changes 25necessary in 9-1-1 call taking protocols and scripts used in   HB3697- 14 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b19-1-1 PSAPs where those protocols and scripts are based on or 2otherwise dependent on national providers for their operation. 3    (c) The Statewide Advisory Committee shall recommend a 4system for gathering data related to the coordination of the 59-1-1 and 9-8-8 systems for purposes of allowing the parties 6to make ongoing improvements in that system. As practical, the 7system shall attempt to determine issues, which may include, 8but are not limited to including, but not limited to:9        (1) the volume of calls coordinated between 9-1-1 and 10    9-8-8;11        (2) the volume of referrals from other first 12    responders to 9-8-8;13        (3) the volume and type of calls deemed appropriate 14    for referral to 9-8-8 but could not be served by 9-8-8 15    because of capacity restrictions or other reasons;16        (4) the appropriate information to improve 17    coordination between 9-1-1 and 9-8-8; and18        (5) the appropriate information to improve the 9-8-8 19    system, if the information is most appropriately gathered 20    at the 9-1-1 PSAPs; and .21        (6) the number of instances of mobile mental health 22    relief providers initiating petitions for involuntary 23    commitment, broken down by county and contracting entity 24    employing the petitioning mobile mental health relief 25    providers and the aggregate demographic data of the 26    individuals subject to those petitions.   HB3697- 15 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    (d) The Statewide Advisory Committee shall consist of:2        (1) the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, ex officio;3        (2) one representative designated by the Illinois 4    Chapter of National Emergency Number Association (NENA);5        (3) one representative designated by the Illinois 6    Chapter of Association of Public Safety Communications 7    Officials (APCO);8        (4) one representative of the Division of Mental 9    Health;10        (5) one representative of the Illinois Department of 11    Public Health;12        (6) one representative of a statewide organization of 13    EMS responders;14        (7) one representative of a statewide organization of 15    fire chiefs;16        (8) two representatives of statewide organizations of 17    law enforcement; 18        (9) two representatives of mental health, behavioral 19    health, or substance abuse providers; and20        (10) four representatives of advocacy organizations 21    either led by or consisting primarily of individuals with 22    intellectual or developmental disabilities, individuals 23    with behavioral disabilities, or individuals with lived 24    experience.25    (e) The members of the Statewide Advisory Committee, other 26than the Statewide 9-1-1 Administrator, shall be appointed by   HB3697- 16 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1the Secretary of Human Services.2    (f) The Statewide Advisory Committee shall continue to 3meet until this Act has been fully implemented, as determined 4by the Division of Mental Health, and mobile mental health 5relief providers are available in all parts of Illinois. The 6Division of Mental Health may reconvene the Statewide Advisory 7Committee at its discretion after full implementation of this 8Act. 9(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 103-105, eff. 6-27-23.) 10    (50 ILCS 754/55)11    Sec. 55. Immunity. 12    (a) The exemptions from civil liability in Section 15.1 of 13the Emergency Telephone System Systems Act apply to any act or 14omission in the development, design, installation, operation, 15maintenance, performance, or provision of service directed by 16this Act.17    (b) Persons, agencies, governmental bodies, private 18organizations, governmental organizations, or institutions 19that in good faith provide emergency or nonemergency 20behavioral health services during a Department of Human 21Services-approved training course, in the normal course of 22conducting their duties, or in an emergency, may not be held 23civilly liable or liable for civil damages as a result of any 24acts or omissions in providing those services unless the acts 25or omissions constitute willful and wanton misconduct. This   HB3697- 17 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1immunity from civil liability extends to the administration, 2sponsorship, authorization, support, finance, education, or 3supervision of emergency behavioral health crisis services 4personnel who are certified, licensed, or authorized under 5this Act, including persons participating in a Department of 6Human Services-approved training program.7    (c) The exemption from civil liability for emergency care 8provided in the Good Samaritan Act applies to anyone providing 9care under this Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; revised 7-29-24.) 11    (50 ILCS 754/65)12    Sec. 65. PSAP and emergency service dispatched through a 139-1-1 PSAP; coordination of activities with mobile and 14behavioral health services. 15(a) Each 9-1-1 PSAP and emergency service dispatched through a 169-1-1 PSAP must begin coordinating its activities with the 17mobile mental and behavioral health services established by 18the Division of Mental Health once all 3 of the following 19conditions are met, but not later than July 1, 2027 2025: 20        (1) the Statewide Committee has negotiated useful 21    protocol and 9-1-1 operator script adjustments with the 22    contracted services providing these tools to 9-1-1 PSAPs 23    operating in Illinois;24        (2) the appropriate Regional Advisory Committee has 25    completed design of the specific 9-1-1 PSAP's process for   HB3697- 18 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1    coordinating activities with the mobile mental and 2    behavioral health service; and 3        (3) the mobile mental and behavioral health service is 4    available in their jurisdiction.5    (b) To achieve the conditions of subsection (a) by July 1, 62027, the following activities shall be completed:7        (1) No later than June 30, 2025, pilot testing of the 8    revised protocols;9        (2) No later than June 30, 2026:10            (A) assessment and evaluation of the pilots;11            (B) revisions, as needed, of protocols and 12        operations based on assessment and evaluation of the 13        pilots;14            (C) implementation of revised protocols at pilot 15        sites; and16            (D) implementation of revised protocols by PSAPs 17        who are ready to implement, otherwise known as early 18        adopters; and19        (3) No later than June 30, 2027, implementation of 20    revised protocols by all remaining PSAPs, including any 21    PSAPs that previously cited financial barriers to updating 22    systems.23(Source: P.A. 102-580, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1109, eff. 12-21-22; 24103-105, eff. 6-27-23; 103-645, eff. 7-1-24.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.  HB3697- 19 -LRB104 12197 RTM 22302 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    50 ILCS 754/54    50 ILCS 754/155    50 ILCS 754/256    50 ILCS 754/307    50 ILCS 754/408    50 ILCS 754/559    50 ILCS 754/65